dictsource/om_rules
// Oromo translation rules

.group a
          a          a
          aa         a:


.group b
          b          b
          bb         b:


.group c
          c          tS'


.group d
          d          d
          dd         d:


.group e
          e          e
          ee         e:

.group f
          f          f


.group g
          g          g
          gg         g:


.group h
          h          h


.group i
          i          i
          ii         i:


.group j
          j          dZ


.group k
          k          k
          kk         k:


.group l
          l          l
          ll         l:


.group m
          m          m
          mm         m:


.group n
          n          n
          nn         n:

.group o
          o          o
          oo         o:
 



.group p
          p          p
          pp         p:


.group q
          q          k
          qq         k:


.group r
          r          r
          rr         r:

.group s
          s          s
          ss         s:


.group t
          t          t
          tt         t:


.group u
          u          u
          uu         u:
 

.group v
          v          v


.group w
          w          v


.group x
          x          t`
          xx         t`:


.group y
          y          y
          yy         y:
  


.group z
          z          ts
          zz         ts     


.group ch
          ch          tS
          
                    
.group sh
          sh          S
          ssh         S:

.group ph
          ph          p`
          

.group dh
          dh           d` // http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Voiced_alveolar_implosive
  

.group ny
          ny          n^
